Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1713
Violations; revocation or suspension; appeal.

Whenever the director finds, after due notice and hearing, that there has been a violation of any of the provisions of sections 44-1701 to 44-1713 or of any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto, he or she may revoke or suspend the license or certificate of authority of the person or insurer guilty of such violation or make such other order or directive as he or she may deem adequate and appropriate to secure compliance with sections 44-1701 to 44-1713 or of any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto. Any action taken by the director pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not preclude such criminal prosecutions as may be otherwise provided by law. An appeal from the decision of the director may be taken, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1959, c. 214, § 13, p. 743;

Laws 1969, c. 359, § 31, p. 1281;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 62.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.